Utah statutes.
57-3-106.   Original documents required -- Captions -- Legibility.
(1)  A person may not present and a county recorder may refuse to accept a
document for recording if the document does not comply with this section.
(2) (a)  Unless otherwise provided, a document presented for recording in the
office of the county recorder shall:
(i)  be an original;
(ii)  contain a brief caption on the first page of the document stating the
nature of the document; and
(iii)  contain a legal description of the property as required under Section
57-3-105.
(b)  If a document is a master form, as defined in Section 57-3-201, the
caption required by Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall state that the document is a
master form.
(3)  A court judgment or an abstract of a court judgment presented for
recording in the office of the county recorder in compliance with Section
78B-5-202 shall:
(a)  be an original or certified copy; and
(b)  include the information identifying the judgment debtor as referred to in
Subsection 78B-5-201(4) either:
(i)  in the judgment or abstract of judgment; or
(ii)  as a separate information statement of the judgment creditor as referred
to in Subsection 78B-5-201(5).
(4)  A judgment, abstract of judgment, and separate information statement of
the judgment creditor does not require an acknowledgment or a legal
description to be recorded.
(5)  A foreign judgment or an abstract of a foreign judgment recorded in the
office of a county recorder shall include the affidavit as required in Section
78B-5-303.
(6)  Any document recorded in the office of the county recorder to release or
assign a judgment lien shall include:
(a)  the name of any judgment creditor, debtor, assignor, or assignee;
(b)  the date of recording; and
(c)  the entry number of the instrument creating the judgment lien.
(7)  A document presented for recording shall be sufficiently legible for the
recorder to make certified copies of the document.
(8) (a) (i)  A document that is of record in the office of the appropriate
county recorder in compliance with this chapter may not be recorded again in
that same county recorder's office unless the original document has been
reexecuted by all parties who executed the document.
(ii)  Unless exempt by statute, an original document that is reexecuted shall
contain the appropriate acknowledgment, proof of execution, jurat, or other
notarial certification for all parties who are reexecuting the document as
required by Title 46, Chapter 1, Notaries Public Reform Act, and Title 57,
Chapter 2, Acknowledgments.
(iii)  A document submitted for rerecording shall contain a brief statement
explaining the reason for rerecording.
(b)  A person may not present and a county recorder may refuse to accept a
document for rerecording if that document does not conform to this section.
(c)  This Subsection (8) applies only to documents executed after July 1,
1998.
(9)  Minor typographical or clerical errors in a document of record may be
corrected by the recording of an affidavit or other appropriate instrument.
(10) (a)  Except as required by federal law, or by agreement between a
borrower under the trust deed and a grantee under the trustee's deed, and
subject to Subsection (10)(b), neither the recordation of an affidavit under
Subsection (9) nor the reexecution and rerecording of a document under
Subsection (8):
(i)  divests a grantee of any real property interest;
(ii)  alters an interest in real property; or
(iii)  returns to the grantor an interest in real property conveyed by
statute.
(b)  A person who reexecutes and rerecords a document under Subsection (8), or
records an affidavit under Subsection (9), shall include with the document or
affidavit a notice containing the name and address to which real property
valuation and tax notices shall be mailed.
